Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6028.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1200. As used in this chapter: (a) "Department of Veterans Affairs" or "VA" means the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. (b) "Domestic violence offense" means any crime alleged to have been committed by an individual against his or her the individual's spouse or former spouse, an individual with whom he or she the individual has a child in common, an individual with whom he or she the individual has had a dating relationship, or an individual who resides or has resided in the same household. (c) "L.E.I.N." means the law enforcement information network regulated under the C.J.I.S. policy council act, 1974 PA 163, MCL 28.211 to 28.215. (d) "Mental illness" means a substantial disorder of thought or mood that significantly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to cope with the ordinary demands of life, including, but not limited to, post-traumatic stress disorder and psychiatric symptoms associated with traumatic brain injury. (e) "Participant" means an individual who is admitted into a veterans treatment court. (f) "Prosecutor" means the prosecuting attorney of the county, the city attorney, the village attorney, or the township attorney. (g) "Traffic offense" means a violation of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or a violation of a local ordinance substantially corresponding to a violation of that act, that involves the operation of a vehicle and, at the time of the violation, is a felony or misdemeanor. (h) "Veteran" means an individual who meets both of the following: (i) Is a veteran as defined in section 1 of 1965 PA 190, MCL 35.61.Served in the United States Armed Forces, including the reserve components, and, except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable. If an individual was discharged or released under dishonorable conditions, the individual may qualify as a veteran if the individual has been diagnosed with a service-connected substance-use disorder, military sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, posttraumatic stress disorder, or another mental health condition. (ii) Served at least 180 days of active duty in the armed forces of the United States. (i) "Veteran service organization" or "VSO" means an organization that is accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, as recognized under 38 CFR 14.628. (j) "Veterans treatment court" or "veterans court" means a court adopted or instituted under section 1201 that provides a supervised treatment program for individuals who are veterans and who abuse or are dependent upon any controlled substance or alcohol or suffer from a mental illness. (k) "Violent offender" means an individual who is currently charged with or has pled guilty to an offense involving the death of , or a serious bodily injury to, any individual, whether or not any of these circumstances are an element of the offense, or an offense that is criminal sexual conduct in any degree. Sec. 1201. (1) A veterans court shall comply with the modified version of the 10 key components of drug treatment courts as promulgated by the Buffalo veterans treatment court, which include all of the following essential characteristics: (a) Integration of alcohol, drug treatment, and mental health services with justice system case processing. (b) Use of a nonadversarial approach; prosecution and defense counsel promote public safety while protecting participants' due process rights. (c) Early and prompt identification and placement of eligible participants in the veterans treatment court program. (d) Provision of access to a continuum of alcohol, drug, mental health, and related treatment and rehabilitation services. (e) Monitoring of abstinence by frequent alcohol and other drug testing. (f) A coordinated strategy that governs veterans treatment court responses to participants' compliance. (g) Ongoing judicial interaction with each veteran. (h) Monitoring and evaluation to measure the achievement of program goals and gauge effectiveness. (i) Continuing interdisciplinary education that promotes effective veterans treatment court planning, implementation, and operations. (j) Forging of partnerships among veterans treatment court, veterans administration, public agencies, and community-based organizations to generate local support and enhance veteran treatment court effectiveness. (2) The circuit court in any judicial circuit or the district court in any judicial district may adopt or institute a veterans treatment court by statute or court rule if the circuit or district court enters into a memorandum of understanding with each participating prosecuting attorney in the circuit or district court district, a representative of the criminal defense bar, a representative or representatives of community treatment providers, a representative or representatives of veterans service organizations in the circuit or district court district, and a representative or representatives of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. However, the memorandum of understanding will only be required to include the prosecuting attorney if the veterans treatment court will include in its program individuals who may be eligible for discharge and dismissal of an offense, a delayed sentence, deferred entry of judgment, or a sentence involving deviation from the sentencing guidelines. The memorandum of understanding also may also include other parties considered necessary, such as any other the prosecutor in the circuit or district court district , or any other prosecutor in the circuit or district court district, local law enforcement, the probation departments in that circuit or district, the local substance abuse coordinating agency for that circuit or district, a domestic violence service provider program that receives funding from the state domestic violence prevention and treatment board, a representative or representatives of the local court funding unit, and community corrections agencies in that circuit or district. The memorandum of understanding must describe the role of each party, and the conditions for which the memorandum of understanding must be renewed and amended. (3) A court that is adopting a veterans treatment court shall participate in training as required by the state court administrative office. (4) A court that has adopted a veterans treatment court under this section may accept participants from any other jurisdiction in this state based upon either the residence of the participant in the receiving jurisdiction or the unavailability of a veterans treatment court in the jurisdiction where the participant is charged. The transfer can occur at any time during the proceedings, including, but not limited to, prior to adjudication. The receiving court shall have has jurisdiction to impose sentence, including, but not limited to, sanctions, incentives, incarceration, and phase changes. A transfer under this subsection is not valid unless it is agreed to by all of the following: (a) The defendant or respondent. (b) The attorney representing the defendant or respondent. (c) The judge of the transferring court. and the prosecutor of the case. (d) The judge of the receiving veterans treatment court. and the prosecutor of a court funding unit of the veterans treatment court. (5) Beginning January 1, 2018, a veterans treatment court operating in this state, or a circuit court in any judicial circuit or the district court in any judicial district seeking to adopt or institute a veterans treatment court, must be certified by the state court administrative office. The state court administrative office shall establish the procedure for certification. Approval and certification under this subsection of a veterans treatment court is required to begin or to continue the operation of a veterans treatment court under this chapter. The state court administrative office shall not recognize and include a veterans treatment court that is not certified under this subsection on the statewide official list of veterans treatment courts. The state court administrative office shall include a veterans treatment court certified under this subsection on the statewide official list of veterans treatment courts. A veterans treatment court that is not certified under this subsection shall not perform any of the functions of a veterans treatment court, including, but not limited to, any of the following functions: (a) Charging a fee under section 1206. (b) Discharging and dismissing a case as provided in section 1209. (c) Receiving funding under section 1211. (d) Certifying to the secretary of state that an individual is eligible to receive a restricted license under section 1084 of this act and section 304 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.304. Sec. 1203. (1) A veterans treatment court shall determine whether an individual may be admitted to the veterans treatment court. No individual has a right to be admitted into a veterans treatment court. However, an individual is not eligible for admission into a veterans treatment court if he or she the individual is a violent offender. An individual is eligible for admission into a veterans treatment court if he or she the veteran has previously had an offense discharged or dismissed as a result of participation in a veterans treatment court, drug treatment court, or other specialty court, but he or she shall not have the judge shall determine if the veteran may have a subsequent offense discharged or dismissed as a result of participating in the veterans treatment court. (2) In addition to admission to a veterans treatment court under this act, an individual who is eligible for admission under this act may also be admitted to a veterans treatment court under any of the following circumstances: (a) The individual has been assigned the status of youthful trainee under section 11 of chapter II of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 762.11. (b) The individual has had criminal proceedings against him or her the individual deferred and has been placed on probation under any of the following: (i) Section 7411 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7411, or a local ordinance or another law of this state, another state, or the United States that is substantially similar to that section. (ii) Section 4a of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.4a, or a local ordinance or another law of this state, another state, or the United States that is substantially similar to that section. (iii) Section 350a or 430 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.350a and 750.430, or a local ordinance or another law of this state, another state, or the United States that is substantially similar to those sections. (3) To be eligible for admission to a veterans treatment court, an individual shall cooperate with and complete a preadmissions screening and evaluation assessment and shall agree to cooperate with any future evaluation assessment as directed by the veterans treatment court. A preadmission screening and evaluation assessment shall must include all of the following: (a) A determination of the individual's veteran status. A review of the DD Form 214 "certificate of release or discharge from active duty" satisfies the requirement of this subdivision. (b) A complete review of the individual's criminal history and whether the individual has been admitted to, has participated in, or is currently participating in a veterans treatment court, drug treatment court, or other specialty court, whether admitted under this act or a law listed under subsection (2), and the results of the individual's participation. A review of the L.E.I.N. satisfies the requirements of this subdivision unless a further review is warranted. The court may accept other verifiable and reliable information from the prosecution or defense to complete its review and may require the individual to submit a statement as to whether or not he or she the individual has previously been admitted to a veterans treatment court, drug treatment court, or other specialty court, and the results of his or her the individual's participation in the prior program or programs. (c) An assessment of the risk of danger or harm to the individual, others, or the community. (d) A review of the individual's history regarding the use or abuse of any controlled substance or alcohol and an assessment of whether the individual abuses controlled substances or alcohol or is drug or alcohol dependent. It is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent practicable, an assessment under this subdivision shall must be a clinical assessment completed by the VA. (e) A review of the individual's mental health history. It is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent practicable, this assessment shall must be a clinical assessment completed by the VA. (f) A review of any special needs or circumstances of the individual that may potentially affect the individual's ability to receive substance abuse treatment and follow the court's orders. (4) Except as otherwise permitted in this act, any statement or other information obtained as a result of an individual's participation in a preadmission screening and evaluation assessment under subsection (3) is confidential, is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, and shall must not be used in a criminal prosecution, except for a statement or information that reveals criminal acts other than personal drug use. (5) The court may request that the department of state police provide to the court information contained in the L.E.I.N. pertaining to an individual applicant's criminal history for the purposes of determining an individual's admission into the veterans treatment court and general criminal history review, including whether the individual has previously been admitted to and participated in a veterans treatment court, drug treatment court, or other specialty court under this act or under a statute listed under subsection (2), and the results of the individual's participation. The department of state police shall provide the information requested by a veterans treatment court under this subsection. Sec. 1205. (1) If the individual being considered for admission to a veterans treatment court is charged in a criminal case, his or her the veteran's admission is subject to all of the following conditions: (a) The offense or offenses allegedly committed by the individual are generally related to the military service of the individual, including the abuse, illegal use, or possession of a controlled substance or alcohol, or mental illness that arises as a result of service. (b) The individual pleads guilty to the charge or charges on the record. (c) The individual waives in writing the right to a speedy trial, the right to representation by an attorney at veterans treatment court review hearings, and, with the agreement of the prosecutor, the right to a preliminary examination. (d) The individual signs a written agreement to participate in the veterans treatment court. (2) An individual who may be eligible for discharge and dismissal of an offense, delayed sentence, deferred entry of judgment, or deviation from the sentencing guidelines shall not be admitted to a veterans treatment court unless the prosecutor first approves the admission of the individual into the veterans treatment court in conformity with the memorandum of understanding under section 1201(2). (2) (3) An individual shall not be admitted to, or remain in, a veterans treatment court under an agreement that would permit the discharge or dismissal of a traffic offense upon on successful completion of the veterans treatment court program. (3) (4) In addition to rights accorded a victim under the William Van Regenmorter crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA 87, MCL 780.751 to 780.834, the veterans treatment court shall permit any victim of the offense or offenses of which the individual is charged, any victim of a prior offense of which that individual was convicted, and members of the community in which the offenses were committed or in which the defendant resides to submit a written statement to the court regarding the advisability of admitting the individual into the veterans treatment court. (4) (5) An individual who has waived his or her the individual's right to a preliminary examination and has pled guilty as part of his or her the individual's application to a veterans treatment court and who is not admitted to a veterans treatment court shall be permitted to withdraw his or her the individual's plea and is entitled to a preliminary examination. Sec. 1206. (1) All of the following conditions apply to an individual admitted to a veterans treatment court: (a) For an individual who is admitted to a veterans treatment court based upon on having a criminal charge currently filed against him or her, the individual, the court shall accept the individual's plea of guilty. (b) One of the following applies to an individual who pled guilty to a criminal charge for which he or she the individual was admitted to a veterans treatment court, as applicable: (i) If the individual pled guilty to an offense that is not a traffic offense and may be eligible for discharge and dismissal under the agreement with the court and prosecutor upon on successful completion of the veterans treatment court program, the court shall not enter a judgment of guilt. (ii) If the individual pled guilty to a traffic offense or another offense but is not eligible for discharge and dismissal under the agreement with the court and prosecutor upon successful completion of the veterans treatment court program, the court shall enter a judgment of guilt. (c) Under the agreement with the individual, and the prosecutor, the court may delay or defer further proceedings as provided in section 1 of chapter XI of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 771.1, or proceed to sentencing, as applicable in that case under that agreement, and place the individual on probation or other court supervision in the veterans treatment court program with terms and conditions according to the agreement and as considered necessary by the court. (2) Unless a memorandum of understanding made pursuant to under section 1088 between a receiving veterans treatment court and the court of original jurisdiction provides otherwise, the original court of jurisdiction maintains jurisdiction over the veterans treatment court participant as provided in this act until final disposition of the case, but not longer than the probation period fixed under section 2 of chapter XI of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 771.2. (3) The veterans treatment court shall cooperate with, and act in a collaborative manner with, the prosecutor, defense counsel, treatment providers, the local substance abuse coordinating agency for that circuit or district, probation departments, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, local VSOs in that circuit or district, and, to the extent possible, local law enforcement, the department of corrections, and community corrections agencies. (4) The veterans treatment court may require an individual admitted into the court to pay a veterans treatment court fee that is reasonably related to the cost to the court for administering the veterans treatment court program as provided in the memorandum of understanding under section 1201(2). The clerk of the veterans treatment court shall transmit the fees collected to the treasurer of the local funding unit at the end of each month. (5) The veterans treatment court may request that the department of state police provide to the court information contained in the L.E.I.N. pertaining to an individual applicant's criminal history for purposes of determining the individual's compliance with all court orders. The department of state police shall provide the information requested by a veterans treatment court under this subsection. Sec. 1209. (1) Upon On completion or termination of the veterans treatment court program, the court shall find on the record or place a written statement in the court file as to whether the participant completed the program successfully or whether the individual's participation in the program was terminated and, if it was terminated, the reason for the termination. (2) If a participant successfully completes probation or other court supervision and the participant's proceedings were deferred or the participant was sentenced under section 1206, the court shall comply with the agreement made with the participant upon on admission into the veterans treatment court, or the agreement as it was altered after admission by the court with approval of the participant and the prosecutor for that jurisdiction as provided in subsections (3) to (8). (3) If an individual is participating in a veterans treatment court under a statute listed in section 1203(2), the court shall proceed under the applicable section of law. There shall be not more than 1 discharge or dismissal under this subsection. (4) Except as provided in subsection (5), the court, with the agreement of the prosecutor and in conformity with the terms and conditions of the memorandum of understanding under section 1201(2), may discharge and dismiss the proceedings against an individual who meets all of the following criteria: (a) The individual has participated in a veterans treatment court. for the first time. (b) The individual has successfully completed the terms and conditions of the veterans treatment court program. (c) The individual is not required by law to be sentenced to a correctional facility for the crimes to which he or she the individual has pled guilty. (d) The individual is not currently charged with and has not pled guilty to a traffic offense. (e) The individual has not previously been subject to more than 1 of any of the following: (i) Assignment to the status of youthful trainee under section 11 of chapter II of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 762.11. (ii) The dismissal of criminal proceedings against him or her the individual under section 7411 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7411, section 4a of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.4a, or section 350a or 430 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.350a and 750.430. (5) The court may grant a discharge and dismissal of a domestic violence offense only if all of the following circumstances apply: (a) The individual has not previously had proceedings dismissed under section 4a of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.4a. (b) The domestic violence offense is eligible to be dismissed under section 4a of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.4a. (c) The individual fulfills the terms and conditions imposed under section 4a of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.4a, and the discharge and dismissal of proceedings are processed and reported under section 4a of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.4a. (6) A discharge and dismissal under subsection (4) shall be is without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction for purposes of this section or for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon on conviction of a crime. There shall be not more than 1 discharge and dismissal under subsection (4) for an individual. The court shall send a record of the discharge and dismissal to the criminal justice information center of the department of state police, and the department of state police shall enter that information into the L.E.I.N. with an indication of participation by the individual in a veterans treatment court. Unless the court enters a judgment of guilt, all records of the proceedings regarding the participation of the individual in the veterans treatment court under subsection (4) are closed to public inspection and are exempt from public disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, but shall must be open to the courts of this state, another state, or the United States, the department of corrections, law enforcement personnel, and prosecutors only for use in the performance of their duties or to determine whether an employee of the court, department, law enforcement agency, or prosecutor's office has violated his or her the employee's conditions of employment or whether an applicant meets criteria for employment with the court, department, law enforcement agency, or prosecutor's office. The records and identifications division of the department of state police shall retain a nonpublic record of an arrest and the discharge and dismissal under this subsection. (7) Except as provided in subsection (3), (4), or (5), if an individual has successfully completed probation or other court supervision, the court shall do the following: (a) If the court has not already entered an adjudication of guilt or responsibility, enter an adjudication of guilt. (b) If the court has not already sentenced the individual, proceed to sentencing. (c) Send a record of the conviction and sentence or the finding or adjudication of responsibility and disposition to the criminal justice information center of the department of state police. The department of state police shall enter that information into the L.E.I.N. with an indication of successful participation by the individual in a veterans treatment court. (8) For a participant whose participation is terminated or who fails to successfully complete the veterans treatment court program, the court shall enter an adjudication of guilt if the entering of guilt was deferred or sentencing was delayed under section 1206 and shall then proceed to sentencing or disposition of the individual for the original charges to which the individual pled guilty prior to admission to the veterans treatment court. Upon on sentencing or disposition of the individual, the court shall send a record of that sentence or disposition and the individual's unsuccessful participation in the veterans treatment court to the criminal justice information center of the department of state police, and the department of state police shall enter that information into the L.E.I.N., with an indication that the individual unsuccessfully participated in a veterans treatment court. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.